Arkansas, session 2025, HB1605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-11-1401 is amended to read as follows:
19-11-1401. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Construction
Manager-General Contractor Method of Procurement Pilot Program”.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-11-1404 is amended to read as follows:
19-11-1404. Construction Manager-General Contractor Method of
Procurement Pilot Program — Creation.
*JLL086*
02/26/2025 9:48:53 AM JLL086

HB1605
(a) The State Highway Commission may develop a Construction Manager-
General Contractor Method of Procurement Pilot Program to test the
utilization of the construction manager-general contractor method as a cost-
effective option for constructing transportation projects.
(b)(1)(A) For the first phase of the program, the commission may
select a total of five (5) transportation projects on which to utilize the
construction manager-general contractor method.
(B)(i) The sum of the construction cost estimates prepared
as required under § 19-11-1407 of all five (5) construction manager-general
contractor method transportation projects selected under subdivision
(b)(1)(A) of this section shall not exceed two hundred million dollars
($200,000,000).
(ii) A construction cost estimate of a construction
manager-general contractor method transportation project selected under
subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall not exceed one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000).
(2)(A) For the second phase of the program, beginning on August
1, 2023, the commission may select a total of five (5) additional
transportation projects that are not currently in the procurement process on
which to utilize the construction manager-general contractor method.
(B)(i) The sum of the construction cost estimates prepared
as required under § 19-11-1407 of all five (5) construction manager-general
contractor method transportation projects selected under subdivision
(b)(2)(A) of this section shall not exceed five hundred million dollars
($500,000,000).
(ii) A construction cost estimate of a construction
manager-general contractor method transportation project selected under
subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall not exceed one hundred fifty
million dollars ($150,000,000).
(c) The Director of State Highways and Transportation shall send
written notice identifying the transportation project and the reasons for
deciding to apply the construction manager-general contractor method to that
specific transportation project to:
(1) The Chair of the House Committee on Public Transportation;
and
(2) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Transportation,
02/26/2025 9:48:53 AM JLL086

HB1605
Technology, and Legislative Affairs.
(d) The program established under this subchapter shall terminate no
later than June 30, 2026.
(b) The commission may use the Construction Manager-General Contractor
Method of Procurement Program for any transportation project for which the
construction cost estimate prepared under § 19-11-1407 does not exceed three
hundred million dollars ($300,000,000).

SECTION 3. Uncodified Acts 2023, No. 823, § 3, is repealed.
SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Study of benefits and costs.
(a) The Director of the Arkansas Department of Transportation shall
provide an independent consultant study that compares the benefits and costs
for projects using the construction manager-general contractor method of
procurement versus the traditional design build delivery method of
procurement.
(b) The study required under subsection (a) of this section shall be
submitted to the Arkansas Legislative Audit for review.



















02/26/2025 9:48:53 AM JLL086